Washington statutes.
RCW 18.28.100

Contract requirements.

Every contract between a debt adjuster and a debtor shall:

(1) List every debt to be handled with the creditor's name and disclose the approximate total of all known debts;

(2) Provide in precise terms payments reasonably within the ability of the debtor to pay;

(3) Disclose in precise terms the rate and amount of all of the debt adjuster's charges and fees;

(4) Disclose the approximate number and amount of installments required to pay the debts in full;

(5) Disclose the name and address of the debt adjuster and of the debtor;

(6) Provide that the debt adjuster shall notify the debtor, in writing, within five days of notification to the debt adjuster by a creditor that the creditor refuses to accept payment pursuant to the contract between the debt adjuster and the debtor;

(7) Contain the following notice in ten point boldface type or larger directly above the space reserved in the contract for the signature of the buyer: NOTICE TO DEBTOR:

(a) Do not sign this contract before you read it or if any spaces intended for the agreed terms are left blank.

(b) You are entitled to a copy of this contract at the time you sign it.

(c) You may cancel this contract within three days of signing by sending notice of cancellation by certified mail return receipt requested to the debt adjuster at his or her address shown on the contract, which notice shall be posted not later than midnight of the third day (excluding Sundays and holidays) following your signing of the contract; and

(8) Contain such other and further provisions or disclosures as are necessary for the protection of the debtor and the proper conduct of business by the debt adjuster.

[ 1999 c 151 s 104; 1979 c 156 s 5; 1967 c 201 s 10.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Effective date—1999 c 151: See notes following RCW 18.28.010.

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 156: See notes following RCW 18.28.010.